Utah statutes.
32A-9-105.   Bond.
(1)  Each warehousing licensee shall post a cash or corporate surety bond in
the penal sum of $10,000 payable to the department, which the licensee has
procured and must maintain for so long as the licensee continues to operate as
a warehousing licensee.
(2)  The bond shall be in a form approved by the attorney general, conditioned
upon the licensee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the
commission.
(3)  If the surety bond is canceled due to the licensee's negligence, a $300
reinstatement fee may be assessed.  No part of any cash or corporate bond so
posted may be withdrawn during the period the license is in effect. A bond
filed by a licensee may be forfeited if the license is finally revoked.
